Tennessee statutes. Title 2 Elections
Part 2

Registration by Other State Agencies

2-2-201. Voter registration applications through department of safety — Contents.

In addition to any other voter registration procedure provided for by law, the department of safety and each county election commission shall provide for voter registration procedures as follows:

The department of safety shall include a voter registration application as part of any motor vehicle driver license application or photo identification license used in Tennessee. Except as provided in subdivision (2)(B), an individual who completes the application and is otherwise eligible shall be registered to vote in accordance with the information supplied by the individual;

The voter registration section of the application:

May require a second signature or other information that duplicates, or is in addition to, information in the license section of the application only if the duplicate or additional information is necessary for prevention of multiple registration of the same individual, for determination of eligibility to vote, or for administration of voter registration or other aspects of the election process;

Shall include a box or other device to permit an applicant for a motor vehicle driver license or photo identification license to decline to register to vote;

Shall include a statement that specifies each eligibility requirement for voting, contains an attestation that the applicant meets each such requirement, including citizenship, and requires the signature of the applicant, under penalty of perjury;

Shall be made available by the department to the appropriate county election commission office; and

Shall be processed as an in-person voter registration;

No information relating to a declination under subdivision (2)(B) may be used for other than official election-related purposes;

Any motor vehicle driver license or photo identification license form used for change of address of residence shall also serve as a notification of change of address of residence for voter registration;

The motor vehicle driver license or photo identification license application and change of address forms used in this state shall be subject to approval by the secretary of state for purposes of voter registration under this section; and

A completed voter registration or change of address of voter registration accepted at a motor vehicle office shall be transmitted to the appropriate county election commission office not later than ten (10) days after the date of acceptance; provided, that if the document is accepted within five (5) days before the last day for registration to vote in an election, the application shall be transmitted to the appropriate county election commission office not later than five (5) days after the date of acceptance.

Acts 1994, ch. 947, § 2; 2014, ch. 724, § 10.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment rewrote (2)(E) which read: “Shall be processed as a voter registration-by-mail form, in accordance with §2-2-115”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 724, § 12. April 16, 2014.

Cross-References. Offense of perjury, penalties, title 39, chapter 16, part 7.

2-2-202. Voter registration through other state agencies.

In addition to any other voter registration procedure provided by law and by §2-2-201:

All offices in the state that provide public assistance;

All offices in the state that provide state-funded programs primarily engaged in providing services to persons with disabilities; and

Public libraries, public high schools, offices of county clerks and offices of county registers of deeds;

shall serve as voter registration agencies. Those agencies designated under subdivision (2) that provide services to a person with a disability at the person's home shall provide the voter registration services at the person's home; provided, that a public library, a county clerk's office, or a county register of deeds office shall not serve as a voter registration agency if such office is located in the same building as the county election commission's office.

Acts 1994, ch. 947, § 3; 1997, ch. 501, § 1.

2-2-203. Prohibited acts by registering agencies — Penalty.

A person who provides service described in § 2-2-202 shall not:

Seek to influence an applicant's political preference or party registration;

Display any such political preference or party allegiance; or

Make any statement to an applicant or take any action, the purpose or effect of which is to discourage the applicant from registering to vote.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1994, ch. 947, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. References to the county “registrar-at-large” and “deputy registrar” have been changed to “administrator of elections” and “deputy”, respectively, pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 558, §§ 21 and 22.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

2-2-204. Registration procedures.

A voter registration agency that is an office described in § 2-2-202(1) and (2) shall:

Distribute with each application for such service or assistance, and with each recertification, renewal, or change of address form relating to such service or assistance, the voter registration-by-mail application form described in § 2-2-115, unless the applicant, in writing, declines to register to vote;

To the greatest extent practicable, incorporate in that agency's application for services or assistance, recertification, renewal or change of address form, a means by which a person who completes the form may decline, in writing, to register to vote;

Provide to each applicant who does not decline to register to vote the same degree of assistance with regard to the completion of the registration application form as is provided by the office with regard to the completion of its own forms; and

Accept the completed voter registration forms for transmittal to the appropriate county election commission to be processed as a voter registration-by-mail form in accordance with § 2-2-115.

A completed voter registration accepted at a voter registration agency described in this section shall be transmitted to the appropriate county election commission office not later than ten (10) days after the date of acceptance; provided, that if the document is accepted within five (5) days before the last day for registration to vote in an election, the application shall be transmitted to the appropriate county election commission office not later than five (5) days after the date of acceptance.

Acts 1994, ch. 947, § 5.

2-2-205. Registration procedures where agency does not require applications for its services.

To the extent that a voter registration agency is an office, public library or high school described in § 2-2-202(3) and does not require or provide applications for its services, that office, public library or high school shall:

Distribute or otherwise make available the voter registration-by-mail application form described in § 2-2-115 to those individuals whom the office, public library or high school serves;

Provide the person the same degree of assistance with regard to the completion of the registration application form as is provided by the office, public library or high school with regard to the services offered by that office, public library or high school; and

Accept the completed voter registration forms for transmittal to the appropriate county election commission to be processed as a voter registration-by-mail form in accordance with § 2-2-115.

A completed voter registration accepted at a voter registration agency described in this section shall be transmitted to the appropriate county election commission office not later than ten (10) days after the date of acceptance; provided, that if the document is accepted within five (5) days before the last day for registration to vote in an election, the application shall be transmitted to the appropriate county election commission office not later than five (5) days after the date of acceptance.

Acts 1994, ch. 947, § 6; 1997, ch. 501, § 2.

2-2-206. Form for declining to register.

The form by which a person may decline to register to vote that is required by § 2-2-204(a)(2) shall include the following:

The question: “If you are not registered to vote where you live now, would you like to apply to register to vote here today?”;

If the agency provides public assistance, the statement, “Applying to register or declining to register to vote will not affect the amount of assistance that you will be provided by this agency.”;

Boxes for the applicant to check to indicate whether the applicant would like to register or declines to register to vote, together with the statement “IF YOU DO NOT CHECK EITHER BOX, YOU WILL BE CONSIDERED TO HAVE DECIDED NOT TO REGISTER TO VOTE AT THIS TIME.”;

The statement, “If you would like help in filling out the voter registration application form, we will help you. The decision whether to seek or accept help is yours. You may fill out the application form in private.”; and

The statement, “If you believe that someone has interfered with your right to register or to decline to register to vote or your right to privacy in deciding whether to register or in applying to register to vote, you may file a complaint with the coordinator of elections.” The statement shall also include the address and telephone number of the coordinator of elections.

Each voter registration agency shall maintain the declinations completed by their clientele.

Acts 1994, ch. 947, § 7.

2-2-207. Rules and regulations.

The commissioner of safety in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, and the coordinator of elections in accordance with §2-11-201(c), may promulgate rules to effectuate the provisions of this part and §2-2-106.

Acts 1994, ch. 947, § 9.